Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.360

1939 conveyance of shorelands to university—Description.

The commissioner of public lands of the state of Washington is hereby authorized and directed to certify in the manner now provided by law to the governor for deeding to the University of Washington all of the following described Lake Washington shorelands, to wit: Blocks sixteen (16) and seventeen (17), Lake Washington Shorelands, as shown on the map of said shorelands on file in the office of the commissioner of public lands.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.360. Prior: 1939 c 60 s 1; No RRS. Formerly RCW 28.77.333.]